Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-10] Dispute resolution. The
commission shall have jurisdiction statewide to hear any dispute regarding
water resource protection, water permits, or constitutionally protected water
interests, or where there is insufficient water to meet competing needs for
water, whether or not the area involved has been designated as a water
management area under this chapter. The final decision on any matter shall be
made by the commission. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next